Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.30.080

Responsibility for compliance. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the responsibility for compliance with RCW 29B.30.050 through 29B.30.070 shall be with the sponsor of the political advertising and not with the broadcasting station or other medium.

(2) If a broadcasting station or other medium changes the content of a political advertisement, the station or medium shall be responsible for any failure of the advertisement to comply with RCW 29B.30.050 through 29B.30.070 that results from that change.

[ 2024 c 164 s 440; 2010 c 204 s 507; 1984 c 216 s 4. Formerly RCW 42.17A.340, 42.17.540.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.